Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-205
Aquaculturist, defined.

Aquaculturist means any individual, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation, other than an employee of a state or federal hatchery, involved in producing, transporting, or marketing cultured aquatic stock or products thereof.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 15.